Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2326
Appeal; no oral argument; when.

There shall be no oral argument in an appeal to the district court in any criminal case where the sole allegation of error is that the sentence imposed was excessive or excessively lenient or the trial court refused to reduce the sentence upon application of the defendant.

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 15.